Hawaii statutes.
§490:2A-213 Implied warranty of fitness for
particular purpose. Except in a finance lease, if the lessor at the time
the lease contract is made has reason to know of any particular purpose for
which the goods are required and that the lessee is relying on the lessor's
skill or judgment to select or furnish suitable goods, there is in the lease
contract an implied warranty that the goods will be fit for that purpose. [L
1991, c 40, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next